New Mexico, session 2026, SB114.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO: SECTION 1. [NEW MATERIAL] PROHIBITING A HEDGE FUND, PRIVATE EQUITY FIRM, CORPORATION OR OTHER BUSINESS FROM PURCHASING SINGLE-FAMILY RESIDENCES--EXEMPTION.--Except as provided in this section, a hedge fund, private equity firm, corporation or other business is prohibited from purchasing a single-family residential property. A limited liability company organized pursuant to the Limited Liability Company Act is exempt from the provisions of this section. .233163.1